North Carolina statutes. Chapter 42. Landlord and Tenant.
Article 3. Summary Ejectment.

§ 42-26.
Tenant holding over may be dispossessed in certain cases.

Any tenant or lessee of any house or land, and the assigns under the tenant or legal representatives of such tenant or lessee, who holds over and continues in the possession of the demised premises, or any part thereof, without the permission of the landlord, and after demand made for its surrender, may be removed from such premises in the manner hereinafter prescribed in any of the following cases:

When a tenant in possession of real estate holds over after his term has expired.

When the tenant or lessee, or other person under him, has done or omitted any act by which, according to the stipulations of the lease, his estate has ceased.

When any tenant or lessee of lands or tenements, who is in arrear for rent or has agreed to cultivate the demised premises and to pay a part of the crop to be made thereon as rent, or who has given to the lessor a lien on such crop as a security for the rent, deserts the demised premises, and leaves them unoccupied and uncultivated.

An arrearage in costs owed by a tenant for water or sewer services pursuant to G.S. 62-110(g) or electric service pursuant to G.S. 62-110(h) shall not be used as a basis for termination of a lease under this Chapter. Any payment to the landlord shall be applied first to the rent owed and then to charges for electric service, or water or sewer service, unless otherwise designated by the tenant.

In an action for ejectment based upon G.S. 42-26(a)(2), the lease may provide that the landlord’s acceptance of partial rent or partial housing subsidy payment does not waive the tenant’s breach for which the right of reentry was reserved, and the landlord’s exercise of such a provision does not constitute a violation of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes.

History.

4 Geo. II, c. 28; 1868-9, c. 156, s. 19; Code, ss. 1766, 1777; 1905, cc. 297, 299, 820; Rev., s. 2001; C.S., s. 2365; 2001-502, s. 3; 2004-143, s. 2; 2011-252, s. 1; 2012-17, s. 3.

Local Modification.

Johnston: 1933, c. 390.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-143, s. 2, effective August 1, 2004, in subsection (b), substituted “costs” for “additional rent,” substituted “water or sever” for “water and sewer” preceding “services,” added “under this Chapter” at the end of the first sentence,
substituted “payment to the landlord” for “partial payment of monthly rent,” deleted “base” preceding “rent,” and added “owed and then to charges for water or sewer service, unless otherwise designated by the tenant” at the end of the last sentence.

Session Laws 2011-252, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to leases entered into on or after that date, in subsection (b), inserted “or electric service pursuant to G.S. 62-110(h)” in the first sentence, and inserted “electric service, or” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2012-17, s. 3, effective October 1, 2012, added subsection (c). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on defending the low-income tenant in North Carolina, see 2 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1970).

For note on retaliatory evictions and housing code enforcement, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 569 (1971).

For article on installment land contracts in North Carolina, see 3 Campbell L. Rev. 29 (1981).

For comment on landlords’ eviction remedies in the light of Spinks v. Taylor,

303 N.C. 256

, 278 S.E.2d 501 (1981), and the 1981 Act to Clarify Landlord Eviction Remedies in Residential Tenancies, see
60 N.C.L. Rev. 885 (1982).

For article discussing self-help residential eviction by landlords in light of the Landlord Eviction Remedies Act, see 13 N.C. Cent. L.J. 195 (1982).

For comment on the Landlord Eviction Remedies Act in light of Spinks v. Taylor,

303 N.C. 256

, 278 S.E.2d 501 (1981), see
18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 25 (1982).

For article, “Opportunity in a Pandemic: Ending the Eviction Cycle by Constitutionally Providing for Inclusionary Zoning with State-Enacted Land-Use Regulations,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 375 (2021).

§ 42-26.1.

Expired.

§ 42-27.
Local: Refusal to perform contract ground for dispossession.

When any tenant or cropper who enters into a contract for the rental of land for the current or ensuing year willfully neglects or refuses to perform the terms of his contract without just cause, he shall forfeit his right of possession to the premises. This section applies only to the following counties: Alamance, Alexander, Alleghany, Anson, Ashe, Beaufort, Bertie, Bladen, Brunswick, Burke, Cabarrus, Camden, Carteret, Caswell, Chatham, Chowan, Cleveland, Columbus, Craven, Cumberland, Currituck, Davidson, Duplin, Edgecombe, Forsyth, Franklin, Gaston, Gates, Greene, Guilford, Halifax, Harnett, Hertford, Hoke, Hyde, Jackson, Johnston, Jones, Lee, Lenoir, Martin, Mecklenburg, Montgomery, Moore, Nash, New Hanover, Northampton, Onslow, Pasquotank, Pender, Perquimans, Pitt, Polk, Randolph, Robeson, Rockingham, Rowan, Rutherford, Sampson, Stokes, Surry, Swain, Tyrrell, Union, Wake, Warren, Washington, Wayne, Wilson, Yadkin.

History.

4 Geo. II, c. 28; 1868-9, c. 156, s. 19; Code, ss. 1766, 1777; 1905, cc. 297, 299, 820; Rev., s. 2001, subsec. 4; 1907, cc. 43, 153; 1909, cc. 40, 550; C.S., s. 2366; Pub. Loc. Ex. Sess. 1924, c. 66; 1931, cc. 50, 194, 446; 1933, cc. 86, 485; 1935, c. 39; 1943, cc. 69, 115, 459; 1951, c. 279; 1953, c. 271; c. 499, s. 2; 1955, c. 93; 1961, c. 25; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 566, s. 1.

§ 42-28.
Summons issued by clerk.

When the lessor or his assignee files a complaint pursuant to

G.S. 42-26

or 42-27, and asks to be put in possession of the leased premises, the clerk of superior court shall issue a summons requiring the defendant to appear at a certain time and place not to exceed seven days from the issuance of the summons, excluding weekends and legal holidays, to answer the complaint. The plaintiff may claim rent in arrears, and damages for the occupation of the premises since the cessation of the estate of the lessee, not to exceed the jurisdictional amount established by G.S. 7A-210(1), but if he omits to make such claim, he shall not be prejudiced thereby in any other action for their recovery.

History.

1868-9, c. 156, s. 20; 1869-70, c. 212; Code, s. 1767; Rev., s. 2002; C.S., s. 2367; 1971, c. 533, s. 4; 1973, c. 1267, s. 4; 1979, c. 144, s. 4; 1981, c. 555, s. 4; 1983, c. 332, s. 2; 1985, c. 329, s. 1; 1989, c. 311, s. 3; 1993, c. 553, s. 73(c); 1995, c. 460, s. 4.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on defending the low-income tenant in North Carolina, see 2 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1970).

For note discussing preliminary injunctions in employment noncompetition cases in light of A.E.P. Industries, Inc. v. McClure,

308 N.C. 393

, 302 S.E.2d 752 (1983), see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 222 (1984).

For article discussing 1983 amendments to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure relative to magistrate practice, comparing state court magistrate practice, and making certain suggestions, see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 819 (1984).

For note, “When A Hotel Is Your Home, Is There Protection?,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 295 (1993).

§ 42-29.
Service of summons.

The officer receiving the summons shall mail a copy of the summons and complaint to the defendant no later than the end of the next business day or as soon as practicable at the defendant’s last known address in a stamped addressed envelope provided by the plaintiff to the action. The officer may, within five days of the issuance of the summons, attempt to telephone the defendant requesting that the defendant either personally visit the officer to accept service, or schedule an appointment for the defendant to receive delivery of service from the officer. If the officer does not attempt to telephone the defendant or the attempt is unsuccessful or does not result in service to the defendant, the officer shall make at least one visit to the place of abode of the defendant within five days of the issuance of the summons, but at least two days prior to the day the defendant is required to appear to answer the complaint, excluding legal holidays, at a time reasonably calculated to find the defendant at the place of abode to attempt personal delivery of service. He then shall deliver a copy of the summons together with a copy of the complaint to the defendant, or leave copies thereof at the defendant’s dwelling house or usual place of abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then residing therein. If such service cannot be made the officer shall affix copies to some conspicuous part of the premises claimed and make due return showing compliance with this section.

History.

1868-9, c. 156, s. 21; Code, s. 1768; Rev., s. 2003; C.S., s. 2368; 1973, c. 87; 1983, c. 332, s. 1; 1985, c. 102; 1995, c. 460, s. 5; 2009-246, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-246, s. 1, effective October 1, 2009, and applicable to actions filed on or after that date, inserted “but at least two days prior to the day the defendant is required to appear to answer the complaint, excluding legal holidays,” in the third sentence.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Notice Not Adequate for Money Damages. —

In a summary ejectment proceeding where the tenant does not make an appearance, the magistrate may not enter a money judgment for rents and other damages in addition to a order for possession where service of process was effected by first class mail and posting on the premises pursuant to this section. See opinion of Attorney General to Hon. Thomas N. Hix, Chief District Court Judge, 29th Judicial Circuit, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 95 (1992).

Notice Not Adequate for Money Damages. —

Because G.S. 7-217(4) states that the procedure found in this section can be used in summary ejectment cases only, and because summary ejectment is in the nature of an in rem proceeding, an in personam money damages claim cannot be heard and a money judgment cannot be entered in an action where service of process is effected through the alternative method under this section. The requirements for actual service of process found elsewhere in G.S.

G.S. 7A-213

and in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4 would still apply to the claim for rents and other money damages. See opinion of Attorney General to Hon. Thomas N. Hix, Chief District Court Judge, 29th Judicial Circuit, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 95 (1992).

§ 42-30.
Judgment by confession, where plaintiff has proved case, or failure to appear.

The summons shall be returned according to its tenor, and if on its return it appears to have been duly served, and if (i) the plaintiff proves his case by a preponderance of the evidence, (ii) the defendant admits the allegations of the complaint, or (iii) the defendant fails to appear on the day of court, and the plaintiff requests in open court a judgment for possession based solely on the filed pleadings where the pleadings allege defendant’s failure to pay rent as a breach of the lease for which reentry is allowed and the defendant has not filed a responsive pleading, the magistrate shall give judgment that the defendant be removed from, and the plaintiff be put in possession of, the demised premises; and if any rent or damages for the occupation of the premises after the cessation of the estate of the lessee, not exceeding the jurisdictional amount established by G.S. 7A-210(1), be claimed in the oath of the plaintiff as due and unpaid, the magistrate shall inquire thereof, and if supported by a preponderance of the evidence, give judgment as he may find the fact to be.

History.

1868-9, c. 156, s. 22; Code, s. 1769; Rev., s. 2004; C.S., s. 2369; 1971, c. 533, s. 5; 1973, c. 10; c. 1267, s. 4; 1979, c. 144, s. 5; 1981, c. 555, s. 5; 1985, c. 329, s. 1; 1989, c. 311, s. 4; 1993, c. 553, s. 73(d); 2005-423, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-423, s. 10, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “by confession, where plaintiff has proved case, or failure to appear” for “confession or where plaintiff has proved case” in the section heading; and inserted clause (i) and (ii) designations; inserted clause (iii) and inserted “if supported by a preponderance of the evidence” near the end of the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on defending the low-income tenant in North Carolina, see 2 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1970).

For article discussing 1983 amendments to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure relative to magistrate practice, comparing state court magistrate practice, and making certain suggestions, see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 819 (1984).

§ 42-31.
Trial by magistrate.

If the defendant by his answer denies any material allegation in the oath of the plaintiff, the magistrate shall hear the evidence and give judgment as he shall find the facts to be.

History.

1868-9, c. 156, s. 23; Code, s. 1770; Rev., s. 2005; C.S., s. 2370; 1971, c. 533, s. 6.

Legal Periodicals.

For note discussing preliminary injunctions in employment noncompetition cases in light of A.E.P. Industries, Inc. v. McClure,

308 N.C. 393

, 302 S.E.2d 752 (1983), see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 222 (1984).

§ 42-32.
Damages assessed to trial.

On appeal to the district court, the jury trying issues joined shall assess the damages of the plaintiff for the detention of his possession to the time of the trial in that court; and, if the jury finds that the detention was wrongful and that the appeal was without merit and taken for the purpose of delay, the plaintiff, in addition to any other damages allowed, shall be entitled to the amount of rent in arrears, or which may have accrued, to the time of trial in the district court. Judgment for the rent in arrears and for the damages assessed may, on motion, be rendered against the sureties to the appeal.

History.

1868-9, c. 156, s. 28; Code, s. 1775; Rev., s. 2006; C.S., s. 2371; 1945, c. 796; 1971, c. 533, s. 7; 1979, c. 820, s. 7.

Legal Periodicals.

For a survey of 1977 constitutional law, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 943 (1978).

For a survey of 1977 law on property, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 1111 (1978).

§ 42-33.
Rent and costs tendered by tenant.

If, in any action brought to recover the possession of demised premises upon a forfeiture for the nonpayment of rent, the tenant, before judgment given in such action, pays or tenders the rent due and the costs of the action, all further proceedings in such action shall cease. If the plaintiff further prosecutes his action, and the defendant pays into court for the use of the plaintiff a sum equal to that which shall be found to be due, and the costs, to the time of such payment, or to the time of a tender and refusal, if one has occurred, the defendant shall recover from the plaintiff all subsequent costs; the plaintiff shall be allowed to receive the sum paid into court for his use, and the proceedings shall be stayed.

History.

4 Geo. II, c. 28, s. 4; 1868-9, c. 156, s. 26; Code, s. 1773; Rev., s. 2007; C.S., s. 2372.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 property law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1209 (1981).

§ 42-34.
Undertaking on appeal and order staying execution.

Upon appeal to the district court, either party may demand that the case be tried at the first session of the court after the appeal is docketed, but the presiding judge, in his discretion, may first try any pending case in which the rights of the parties or the public demand it. If the case has not been previously continued in district court, the court shall continue the case for an appropriate period of time if any party initiates discovery or files a motion to allow further pleadings pursuant to

G.S. 7A-220

or

G.S. 7A-229

, or for summary judgment pursuant to Rule 56 of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

During an appeal to district court, it shall be sufficient to stay execution of a judgment for ejectment if the defendant appellant pays to the clerk of superior court any rent in arrears as determined by the magistrate and signs an undertaking that he or she will pay into the office of the clerk of superior court the amount of the tenant’s share of the contract rent as it becomes due periodically after the judgment was entered and, where applicable, comply with subdivision (c) below. For the sole purpose of determining the amount of rent in arrears pursuant to a judgment for possession pursuant to G.S. 42-30(iii), the magistrate’s determination shall be based upon (i) the available evidence presented to the magistrate or (ii) the amounts listed on the face of the filed Complaint in Summary Ejectment. Provided however, when the magistrate makes a finding in the record, based on evidence presented in court, that there is an actual dispute as to the amount of rent in arrears that is due and the magistrate specifies the specific amount of rent in arrears in dispute, in order to stay execution of a judgment for ejectment, the defendant appellant shall not be required to pay to the clerk of superior court the amount of rent in arrears found by the magistrate to be in dispute, even if the magistrate’s judgment includes this amount in the amount of rent found to be in arrears. If a defendant appellant appeared at the hearing before the magistrate and the magistrate found an amount of rent in arrears that was not in dispute, and if an attorney representing the defendant appellant on appeal to the district court signs a pleading stating that there is evidence of an actual dispute as to the amount of rent in arrears, then the defendant appellant shall not be required to pay the rent in arrears alleged to be in dispute to stay execution of a judgment for ejectment pending appeal. Any magistrate, clerk, or district court judge shall order stay of execution upon the defendant appellant’s paying the undisputed rent in arrears to the clerk and signing the undertaking. If either party disputes the amount of the payment or the due date in the undertaking, the aggrieved party may move for modification of the terms of the undertaking before the clerk of superior court or the district court. Upon such motion and upon notice to all interested parties, the clerk or court shall hold a hearing within 10 calendar days of the date the motion is filed and determine what modifications, if any, are appropriate. No writ of possession or other execution of the magistrate’s judgment shall take place during the time the aggrieved party’s motion for modification is pending before the clerk of court.

In an ejectment action based upon alleged nonpayment of rent where the judgment is entered more than five business days before the day when the next rent will be due under the lease, the appellant shall make an additional undertaking to stay execution pending appeal. Such additional undertaking shall be the payment of the prorated rent for the days between the day that the judgment was entered and the next day when the rent will be due under the lease.

(c1)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, an indigent defendant appellant, as set forth in

G.S. 1-110

, who prosecutes his or her appeal as an indigent and who meets the requirement of

G.S. 1-288

shall pay the amount of the contract rent as it becomes periodically due as set forth in subsection (b) of this section, but shall not be required to pay rent in arrears as set forth in subsection (b) of this section in order to stay execution pending appeal.

The undertaking by the appellant and the order staying execution may be substantially in the following form: ‘‘State of North Carolina, ‘‘County of ‘‘ , Plaintiff vs. Bond to ‘‘ Defendant Stay Execution On Appeal to District Court ‘‘Now comes the defendant in the above entitled action and respectfully shows the court that judgment for summary ejectment was entered against the defendant and for the plaintiff on the day of ,,by the Magistrate. Defendant has appealed the judgment to the District Court. ‘‘Pursuant to the terms of the lease between plaintiff and defendant, defendant is obligated to pay rent in the amount of $ per , due on the day of each. ‘‘Where the payment of rent in arrears or an additional undertaking is required by

G.S. 42-34

, the defendant hereby tenders $ to the Court as required. ‘‘Defendant hereby undertakes to pay the periodic rent hereinafter due according to the aforesaid terms of the lease and moves the Court to stay execution on the judgment for summary ejectment until this matter is heard on appeal by the District Court. ‘‘This the day of , . Defendant “Upon execution of the above bond, execution on said judgment for summary ejectment is hereby stayed until the action is heard on appeal in the District Court. If defendant fails to make any rental payment to the clerk’s office within five business days of the due date, upon application of the plaintiff, the stay of execution shall dissolve and the sheriff may dispossess the defendant. ‘‘This the day of , . Assistant Clerk of Superior Court.’’ (e) Upon application of the plaintiff, the clerk of superior court shall pay to the plaintiff any amount of the rental payments paid by the defendant into the clerk’s office which are not claimed by the defendant in any pleadings. (f) If the defendant fails to make a payment within five business days of the due date according to the undertaking and order staying execution, the clerk, upon application of the plaintiff, shall issue execution on the judgment for possession. (g) When it appears by stipulation executed by all of the parties or by final order of the court that the appeal has been resolved, the clerk of court shall disburse any accrued moneys of the undertaking remaining in the clerk’s office according to the terms of the stipulation or order.

Click to view

History.

1868-9, c. 156, s. 25; 1883, c. 316; Code, s. 1772; Rev., s. 2008; C.S., s. 2373; 1921, c. 90; Ex. Sess., 1921, c. 17; 1933, c. 154; 1937, c. 294; 1949, c. 1159; 1971, c. 533, s. 8; 1979, c. 820, ss. 1-6; 1998-125, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 59; 2005-423, s. 11; 2009-279, s. 2; 2019-243, s. 16.

Local Modification.

Burke: Pub. Loc. 1927, c. 57; Cabarrus, Craven, Davie, Granville, Iredell, Mecklenburg, Swain, Watauga: 1921, c. 90; Ex. Sess., 1921, c. 17.

§ 42-34.1.
Rent pending execution of judgment; post bond pending appeal.

If the judgment in district court is against the defendant appellant, it is sufficient to stay execution of the judgment during the 30-day time period for taking an appeal provided for in Rule 3 of the North Carolina Rules of Appellate Procedure if the defendant appellant posts a bond as provided in G.S. 42-34(b). No additional security under

G.S. 1-292

is required. If the defendant appellant fails to make rental payments as provided in the undertaking within five business days of the day rent is due under the terms of the residential rental agreement, the clerk of superior court shall, upon application of the plaintiff appellee, immediately issue a writ of possession, and the sheriff shall dispossess the defendant appellant as provided in

G.S. 42-36.2

.

(a1)

If the judgment in district court is against the defendant appellant and the defendant appellant does not appeal the judgment, the defendant appellant shall pay rent to the plaintiff for the time the defendant appellant remains in possession of the premises after the judgment is given. Rent shall be prorated if the judgment is executed before the day rent would become due under the terms of the lease. The clerk of court shall disburse any rent in arrears paid by the defendant appellant in accordance with a stipulation executed by all parties or, if there is no stipulation, in accordance with the judge’s order.

If the judgment in district court is against the defendant appellant and the defendant appellant appeals the judgment, it is sufficient to stay execution of the judgment if the defendant appellant posts a bond as provided in G.S. 42-34(b). No additional security under

G.S. 1-292

is required. If the defendant appellant fails to perfect the appeal or the appellate court upholds the judgment of the district court, the execution of the judgment shall proceed. The clerk of court shall not disburse any rent in arrears paid by the defendant appellant until all appeals have been resolved.

History.

1998-125, s. 2; 2012-17, s. 1; 2021-47, s. 8; 2021-88, s. 5.

§ 42-35.
Restitution of tenant, if case quashed, etc., on appeal.

If the proceedings before the magistrate are brought before a district court and quashed, or judgment is given against the plaintiff, the district or other court in which final judgment is given shall, if necessary, restore the defendant to the possession, and issue such writs as are proper for that purpose.

History.

1868-9, c. 156, s. 27; Code, s. 1774; Rev., s. 2009; C.S., s. 2374; 1971, c. 533, s. 9.

§ 42-36.
Damages to tenant for dispossession, if proceedings quashed, etc.

If, by order of the magistrate, the plaintiff is put in possession, and the proceedings shall afterwards be quashed or reversed, the defendant may recover damages of the plaintiff for his removal.

History.

1868-9, c. 156, s. 30; Code, s. 1776; Rev., s. 2010; C.S., s. 2375; 1971, c. 533, s. 10.

§ 42-36.1.
Lease or rental of manufactured homes.

The provisions of this Article shall apply to the lease or rental of manufactured homes, as defined in

G.S. 143-145

.

History.

1971, c. 764; 1985, c. 487, s. 8.

§ 42-36.1A.
Judgments for possession more than 30 days old.

Prior to obtaining execution of a judgment that has been entered for more than 30 days for possession of demised premises, a landlord shall sign an affidavit stating that the landlord has neither entered into a formal lease with the defendant nor accepted rental money from the defendant for any period of time after entry of the judgment.

History.

1995, c. 460, s. 7.

§ 42-36.2.
Notice to tenant of execution of writ for possession of property; storage of evicted tenant’s personal property.

When Sheriff May Remove Property. — Before removing a tenant’s personal property from demised premises pursuant to a writ for possession of real property or an order, the sheriff shall give the tenant notice of the approximate time the writ will be executed. The time within which the sheriff shall have to execute the writ shall be no more than five days from the sheriff’s receipt thereof. The sheriff shall remove the tenant’s property, as provided in the writ, no earlier than the time specified in the notice, unless:

The landlord, or his authorized agent, signs a statement saying that the tenant’s property can remain on the premises, in which case the sheriff shall simply lock the premises; or

The landlord, or his authorized agent, signs a statement saying that the landlord does not want to eject the tenant because the tenant has paid all court costs charged to him and has satisfied his indebtedness to the landlord.Upon receipt of a statement described in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the sheriff shall return the writ unexecuted to the issuing clerk of court and shall make a notation on the writ of his reasons. The sheriff shall attach a copy of the landlord’s statement to the writ. If the writ is returned unexecuted because the landlord signed a statement described in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the clerk shall make an entry of satisfaction on the judgment docket. If the sheriff padlocks, the costs of the proceeding shall be charged as part of the court costs.

Sheriff May Store Property. — When the sheriff removes the personal property of an evicted tenant from demised premises pursuant to a writ or order the tenant shall take possession of his property. If the tenant fails or refuses to take possession of his property, the sheriff may deliver the property to any storage warehouse in the county, or in an adjoining county if no storage warehouse is located in that county, for storage. The sheriff may require the landlord to advance the cost of delivering the property to a storage warehouse plus the cost of one month’s storage before delivering the property to a storage warehouse. If a landlord refuses to advance these costs when requested to do so by the sheriff, the sheriff shall not remove the tenant’s property, but shall return the writ unexecuted to the issuing clerk of court with a notation thereon of his reason for not executing the writ. Except for the disposition of manufactured homes and their contents as provided in

G.S. 42-25.9(g)

and G.S. 44A-2(e2), within seven days of the landlord’s being placed in lawful possession by execution of a writ of possession and upon the tenant’s request within that seven-day period, the landlord shall release possession of the property to the tenant during regular business hours or at a time agreed upon. During the seven-day period after being placed in lawful possession by execution of a writ of possession, a landlord may move for storage purposes, but shall not throw away, dispose of, or sell any items of personal property remaining on the premises unless otherwise provided for in this Chapter. If, after being placed in lawful possession by execution of a writ, the landlord has offered to release the tenant’s property and the tenant fails to retrieve such property during the landlord’s regular business hours within seven days after execution of the writ, the landlord may throw away, dispose of, or sell the property in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 42-25.9(g)

. If the tenant does not request release of the property within seven days, all costs of summary ejectment, execution and storage proceedings shall be charged to the tenant as court costs and shall constitute a lien against the stored property or a claim against any remaining balance of the proceeds of a warehouseman’s lien sale.

Liability of the Sheriff. — A sheriff who stores a tenant’s property pursuant to this section and any person acting under the sheriff’s direction, control, or employment shall be liable for any claims arising out of the willful or wanton negligence in storing the tenant’s property.

Notice. — The notice required by subsection (a) shall, except in actions involving the lease of a space for a manufactured home as defined in G.S. 143-143.9(6), inform the tenant that failure to request possession of any property on the premises within seven days of execution may result in the property being thrown away, disposed of, or sold. Notice shall be made by one of the following methods:

By delivering a copy of the notice to the tenant or his authorized agent at least two days before the time stated in the notice for serving the writ;

By leaving a copy of the notice at the tenant’s dwelling or usual place of abode with a person of suitable age and discretion who resides there at least two days before the time stated in the notice for serving the writ; or

By mailing a copy of the notice by first-class mail to the tenant at his last known address at least five days before the time stated in the notice for serving the writ.

History.

1983, c. 672, s. 1; 1995, c. 460, s. 6; 1999-278, ss. 3, 4; 2013-334, s. 5; 2015-55, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-334, s. 5, effective September 1, 2013, substituted “five days” for “seven days” in subsection (a); substituted “seven days” for “10 days” or similar language throughout subsection (b) and in subsection (d); and, in subsection (b), deleted the former seventh sentence, which read “After the expiration of the 10 day period, the landlord may throw away, dispose of, or sell the property in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 42-25.9(g)

” and added the present seventh sentence. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-55, s. 1, effective October 1, 2015, substituted “a statement described in subdivision (2) of this subsection” for “either statement by the landlord” in the ending paragraph of subsection (a).

§ 42-36.3.
Death of residential tenant; landlord may file affidavit to remove personal property from the dwelling unit.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, when a decedent who is the sole occupant of a dwelling unit dies leaving tangible personal property in the dwelling unit, the landlord may, instead of commencing a summary ejectment action, file an affidavit as provided in

G.S. 28A-25-7

.

History.

2012-17, s. 9.